Hawaii statutes.
§27G-6 Access Hawaii committee special
fund. There is established in the state treasury the access Hawaii
committee special fund, into which shall be deposited fees collected by the
office of enterprise technology services for the purpose of supporting the
access Hawaii committee. The chief information officer may appoint a portal
program manager exempt from chapter 76, which may be funded by the access
Hawaii committee special fund. Expenditures from the access Hawaii committee
special fund shall be approved by the access Hawaii committee; provided that
information on income and expenditures shall be subject to legislative review
and oversight in each budget submittal from the department of accounting and
general services. [L 2010, c 101, §1; am L 2016, c 58, §5]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next